Hawaii statutes.
[§431:9A-125] Continuing education
recordkeeping. (a) Licensees shall maintain their own continuing
education records and shall keep these records for four years after completion
of an approved continuing education course.

(b) Approved course providers shall maintain
attendance records for five years to permit the commissioner to verify the
attendance and course completion of all licensees enrolled in an approved
course. These course providers shall make the records available at all times
to the commissioner. [L 2001, c 216, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next